Washington statutes.
RCW 19.174.040

Lighting requirements—Compliance.

(1) An operator of an automated teller machine or night deposit facility installed on or after July 1, 1994, shall comply with RCW 19.174.050 beginning on the date the automated teller machine or night deposit facility is installed. Compliance with RCW 19.174.050 by an operator as to an automated teller machine and night deposit facility existing as of July 1, 1994, is optional until July 1, 1996, and mandatory thereafter. This section applies to an operator of an automated teller machine or night deposit facility only to the extent that the operator controls the access area or defined parking area to be lighted.

(2) If an access area or a defined parking area is not controlled by the operator of an automated teller machine or night deposit facility, and if the person who leased the automated teller machine or night deposit facility site to the operator controls the access area or defined parking area, the person who controls the access area or defined parking area shall comply with RCW 19.174.050 for an automated teller machine or night deposit facility installed on or after July 1, 1994, beginning on the date the automated teller machine or night deposit facility is installed and for an automated teller machine or night deposit facility existing as of July 1, 1994, by or on July 1, 1996.

[ 1993 c 324 s 4.]